src/morphology/affixes/adj.lexc
! ==================== !
! Adjective morphology !
! ==================== !


LEXICON l1	! beinur
+A: adj_a ; !XXX check!
+A: adj_def ;
+A: adjcmp1 ;

LEXICON l2	! leysur
+A: adj_a ;
+A: adj_r_gen ;
+A: adj_def ;
+A: adjcmp1 ;

LEXICON l3	! bíligur
+A: adj_a ;
+A: adj_def ;
+A: adjcmp1 ;

LEXICON l4	! kunnugur
+A: adj_a ;
+A: adj_def ;
+A: adjcmp1 ;

LEXICON l5	! spiltur
+A: adj_a ;
+A: adj_r_gen ;
+A: adj_def ;
+A: adjcmp1 ;

LEXICON l6	! brekaður
+A:%^EDH adj_a ; ! no ð deletion
+A: adj_def ;
+A: adjcmp1 ;

LEXICON l7	! blindur
+A: adj_a ;
+A: adj_r_gen ;
+A: adj_def ;
+A: adjcmp1 ;

LEXICON l8	! kaldur
+A:         a_non_umlaut ;
+A:%^UUML   a_umlaut ;
+A: adj_r_gen ;
+A: adj_def ;
+A: adjcmp1 ;

LEXICON l9	! spakur
+A:         a_non_umlaut ;
+A:%^UUML   a_umlaut ;
+A: adj_r_gen ;
+A: adj_def ;
+A: adjcmp1 ;

LEXICON l10 ! drúgvur
+A: adj_a ;
+A: adj_def ;
+A: adjcmp1 ;

LEXICON l11 ! flógvur
+A: adj_a ; ! _gv_
+A: adj_def ; ! _gv_
+A: adjcmp1 ;

LEXICON l12 ! snjallur
+A:         a_non_umlaut ;
+A:%^UUML      a_umlaut ;
+A: adj_def ;
+A: adjcmp1 ;

LEXICON l13 ! langur
+A:         a_non_umlaut ;
+A:%^UUML      a_umlaut ;
+A: adj_def ;

LEXICON l14 ! harður
+A:         a_non_umlaut ;
+A:%^UUML      a_umlaut ;
+A: adj_def ;
+A: adjcmp1 ;

LEXICON l15 ! blíður
+A: adj_a ;
+A: adj_def ;
+A: adjcmp1 ;

! Check these

LEXICON l16 ! góður
+A: adj_a ;
+A: adj_def ;

LEXICON l17 ! bláur
+A: adj_a ;
+A: adj_def ;
+A: adjcmp1 ;

LEXICON l18 ! keddur
+A: adj_a ;
+A: adj_def ;
+A: adjcmp1 ;

LEXICON l19 ! nýggjur
+A: adj_a ;
+A: adj_def ;
+A: adjcmp1 ;

LEXICON l20 ! stillur
+A: adj_a ;
+A: adj_def ;

LEXICON l21 ! fastur
+A:         a_non_umlaut ;
+A:%^UUML      a_umlaut ;
+A: adj_def ;
+A: adjcmp1 ;

LEXICON l22 ! klæddur
+A:         a_non_umlaut ;
+A:%^UUML      a_umlaut ;
+A:			 a_umlaut ;
+A: adj_def ;
+A: adjcmp1 ;

LEXICON l23 ! rættur
+A:         a_non_umlaut ;
+A:%^UUML      a_umlaut ;
+A:			 a_umlaut ;
+A: adj_def ;
+A: adjcmp1 ;

LEXICON l24 ! frískur
+A: adj_a ;
+A: adj_r_gen ;
+A: adj_def ;
+A: adjcmp1 ;

LEXICON l25 ! danskur
+A:         a_non_umlaut ;
+A:%^UUML      a_umlaut ;
+A:            adj_r_gen ;
+A: adj_def ;
+A: adjcmp1 ;

LEXICON l26 ! vakin
+A:%^EPH a_m_sg_n_null ;
+A:%^EPH a_non_umlaut_obl ;
+A:%^EPH a_umlaut ;
+A:%^EPH adj_def ;

LEXICON l27 ! heiðin
+A:%^EPH a_m_sg_n_null ;
+A:%^EPH a_non_umlaut_obl ;
+A:%^EPH a_umlaut ;
+A:%^EPH adj_def ;

LEXICON l28 ! lítil
+A:%^EPH a_m_sg_n_null ;
+A:%^EPH a_non_umlaut_obl ;
+A:%^EPH a_umlaut ;
+A:%^EPH adj_def ;

LEXICON l29 ! fakur
+A:%^EPH       a_non_umlaut ;
+A:%^EPH%^UUML a_umlaut ;
+A:%^EPH adj_def ;
+A: adjcmp1 ;

LEXICON l30 ! tepur
+A:%^EPH adj_a ;
+A:%^EPH adj_def ;
+A: adjcmp1 ;

LEXICON l31 ! trupul
+A:%^EPH       a_non_umlaut ;
+A:%^EPH%^UUML a_umlaut ;
+A:%^EPH adj_def ;
+A:%^EPH adj_def ;

LEXICON l32 ! búgvin
+A:%^EPH       a_non_umlaut ;
+A:%^EPH%^UUML a_umlaut ;
+A:%^EPH adj_def ;
+A:%^EPH adj_def ;

LEXICON l33 ! gamal
+A:            a_m_sg_n_null ; ! gamal
+A:%^EPH       a_non_umlaut_obl ;
+A:%^EPH%^UUML a_umlaut ;
+A:%^EPH adj_def ;

LEXICON l34 ! dottin
+A:%^EPH       a_non_umlaut ;
+A:%^EPH%^UUML a_umlaut ;
+A:%^EPH adj_def ;
+A:%^EPH adj_def ;

LEXICON l35 ! feingin ! not complete, needs umlaut
+A:%^EPH       a_non_umlaut ;
+A:%^EPH%^UUML a_umlaut ;
+A:%^EPH adj_def ;
+A:%^EPH adj_def ;

LEXICON l36 ! liðugur
+A: adj_a ; !XXX check!
+A: adj_def ;
+A: adjcmp1 ;

LEXICON l37 ! grammur
+A: adj_a ; !XXX check!
+A: adj_def ;
+A: adjcmp1 ;

LEXICON l38 ! kollutur
+A: adj_a ; !XXX check!
+A: adj_def ;

LEXICON l39 ! settur
+A: adj_a ; !XXX check!
+A: adj_def ;
+A: adjcmp1 ;

! Irregular adjectives

LEXICON STOR
+A:stór adj_a ;
+A:stór adj_def ;
+A+Cmp:størr indef_cmp_adj_decl ;
+A+Superl:størst indef_superl_adj_decl ;

LEXICON andi
+A: HOMONYM_ADJ_FORMS ;
+Adv: # ;

LEXICON HOMONYM_ADJ_FORMS
+Msc: HOMONYM_ADJ_NUM ;
+Fem: HOMONYM_ADJ_NUM ;
+Neu: HOMONYM_ADJ_NUM ;

LEXICON HOMONYM_ADJ_NUM
+Sg: HOMONYM_ADJ_CASE ;
+Pl: HOMONYM_ADJ_CASE ;

LEXICON HOMONYM_ADJ_CASE
+Nom: HOMONYM_ADJ_DEF ;
+Acc: HOMONYM_ADJ_DEF ;
+Gen: HOMONYM_ADJ_DEF ;
+Dat: HOMONYM_ADJ_DEF ;

LEXICON HOMONYM_ADJ_DEF
+Indef: # ;
+Def:   # ;


! Irregular comaratives
! =====================

LEXICON ELDRI
eldri_m ;
eldri_f ;
eldri_n ;

LEXICON ELSTUR
:%>ur eldri_m ;
      eldri_f ;
      eldri_n ;
      adj_def ;

LEXICON eldri_m
+Msc: HOMONYM_ADJ_NUM ; 

LEXICON eldri_f
+Fem: HOMONYM_ADJ_NUM ;

LEXICON eldri_n
+Neu: HOMONYM_ADJ_NUM ;
+Adv: # ;

LEXICON indecladj 
+A: HOMONYM_ADJ_FORMS ;

! Intermediate adjectival lexica
! ==============================

LEXICON adj_a
 a_non_umlaut ; ! For the non-umlauted forms
     a_umlaut ; ! for the umlauted forms
     
LEXICON a_non_umlaut
 a_m_sg_n ;
 a_non_umlaut_obl ;

LEXICON a_non_umlaut_obl
 a_m_sg_a ;
 a_m_sg_g ;

 a_m_pl_n ;
 a_m_pl_a ;
 a_m_pl_g ;

 a_f_sg_a ;
 a_f_sg_d ;
 a_f_sg_g ;

 a_f_pl_n ;
 a_f_pl_a ;
 a_f_pl_d ;
 a_f_pl_g ;

 a_n_sg_n ;
 a_n_sg_a ;

 a_n_sg_g ;
 a_n_pl_g ;

LEXICON a_umlaut
 a_m_sg_d ;
 a_m_pl_d ;

 a_f_sg_n ;

 a_n_sg_d ;
 a_n_pl_n ;
 a_n_pl_a ;
 a_n_pl_d ;


LEXICON adj_r_gen
a_m_pl_g_ra ;
a_f_sg_g_rar ;
a_f_pl_g_ra ;
a_n_pl_g_ra ;

! Adjectival case lexica
! ======================


! Indefinite declension
! _____________________

! Msc
LEXICON a_m_sg_n
+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ur # ;

LEXICON a_m_sg_n_null
+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: # ;

LEXICON a_m_sg_a
+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>an # ;

LEXICON a_m_sg_d
+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>um # ;

LEXICON a_m_sg_g
+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s  # ; 

LEXICON a_m_pl_n
+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ir  # ; 

LEXICON a_m_pl_a
+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ar  # ; 

LEXICON a_m_pl_d
+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um  # ; 

LEXICON a_m_pl_g
+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a  # ; 

LEXICON a_m_pl_g_ra
+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ra  # ; 


! Fem

LEXICON a_f_sg_n
+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>%^UUML  # ; 

LEXICON a_f_sg_a
+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>a  # ; 

LEXICON a_f_sg_d
+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ari  # ; 

LEXICON a_f_sg_g
+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ar  # ; 

LEXICON a_f_sg_g_rar
+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>rar  # ; 

LEXICON a_f_pl_n
+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ar  # ; 

LEXICON a_f_pl_a
+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ar  # ; 

LEXICON a_f_pl_d
+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um  # ; 

LEXICON a_f_pl_g
+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a  # ; 

LEXICON a_f_pl_g_ra
+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ra  # ; 


! Neu

LEXICON a_n_sg_n
+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t  # ; 
+Adv:%>t # ;

LEXICON a_n_sg_a
+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t  # ; 

LEXICON a_n_sg_d
+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>um  # ; 

LEXICON a_n_sg_g
+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s  # ; 

LEXICON a_n_pl_n
+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%> # ; 

LEXICON a_n_pl_a
+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%> # ; 

LEXICON a_n_pl_d
+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um  # ; 

LEXICON a_n_pl_g
+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a  # ; 

LEXICON a_n_pl_g_ra
+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ra  # ; 


! Definite declension
! ___________________

LEXICON adj_def
+Msc: adj_def_msc ;
+Fem: adj_def_fem ;
+Neu: adj_def_neu ;


! Gender tags

LEXICON adj_def_msc 
+Sg: adj_def_msc_case ;
+Pl: adj_def_pl ;

LEXICON adj_def_fem 
+Sg:  adj_def_fem_case ;
+Pl: adj_def_pl ;

LEXICON adj_def_neu 
+Sg: adj_def_neu_case ;
+Pl: adj_def_pl ;


! Case tags
 
LEXICON adj_def_msc_case
+Nom+Def:%>i # ;
+Acc+Def:%>a # ;
+Dat+Def:%>a # ;
+Gen+Def:%>a # ;

LEXICON adj_def_fem_case 
+Nom+Def:%>a # ;
+Acc+Def:%>u # ;
+Dat+Def:%>u # ;
+Gen+Def:%>u # ;

LEXICON adj_def_neu_case
+Nom+Def:%>a # ;
+Acc+Def:%>a # ;
+Dat+Def:%>a # ;
+Gen+Def:%>a # ;

LEXICON adj_def_pl
+Nom+Def:%^UUML%>u # ;
+Acc+Def:%^UUML%>u # ;
+Dat+Def:%^UUML%>u # ;
+Gen+Def:%^UUML%>u # ;
+Adv:%>a # ; 

! Comparative
! ===========

LEXICON adjcmp1
+Cmp:ar indef_cmp_adj_decl ;
+Superl:ast indef_superl_adj_decl ;

LEXICON adjcmp2
+Cmp:r indef_cmp_adj_decl ;
+Superl:st indef_superl_adj_decl ;

! Gender

LEXICON indef_cmp_adj_decl
+Msc+Sg: indef_case ;
+Fem+Sg: indef_case ;
+Neu+Sg: indef_case ;

+Msc+Sg+Nom:%>i deftag ;
+Msc+Sg+Acc:%>a deftag ;
+Msc+Sg+Dat:%>a deftag ;
+Msc+Pl:%>u deftag ;
+Fem+Sg+Nom:%>a deftag ;
+Fem+Sg+Acc:%>u deftag ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat:%>u deftag ;
+Fem+Pl:%>u deftag ;
+Neu+Sg+Nom:%>a deftag ;
+Neu+Sg+Acc:%>a deftag ;
+Neu+Sg+Dat:%>a deftag ;
+Neu+Pl:%>u deftag ;
