src/morphology/stems/adj.lexc
LEXICON Adjectives
góður+A+Cmp:betri ELDRI ;
høgur+A+Superl:hægst ELSTUR ; !XXX
illur+A+Cmp:verri ELDRI ;
langur+A+Superl:longst ELSTUR ;
mangur+A+Cmp:fleiri ELDRI ;
mikil+A+Superl:mest ELSTUR ;
seinur+A+Cmp:seinn  indef_cmp_adj_decl ; !XXX
stórur+A+Cmp:størri ELDRI ;
óndur+A+Superl:verst ELSTUR ;
sjálvberandi andi ;
óviðkomandi andi ;
yvirberandi andi ;
tjúktflótandi andi ;
bíligur:bílig  l3	 ;
sáttligur:sáttlig l3 ;
trupul:trupul  l31 ;
altjóða indecladj ; ! Presently no tags.
búførur:búfør l1 ;
flogkvikur:flogkvik l1 ;
hástórur:há STOR ;
javnhvítur:javnhvít l1 ;
kroppstórur:kropp STOR ;
nevastórur:neva STOR ;
norrønur:norrøn l1 ;
sukursjúkur:sukursjúk l1 ;
tútastórur:túta STOR ;
foreldraleysur:foreldraleys l2 ;
ivaleysur:ivaleys l2 ;
ovurhugaleysur:ovurhugaleys l2 ;
streymleysur:streymleys l2 ;
fyndugur:fyndug l4 ;
køstugur:køstug l4 ;
óneyðugur:óneyðug l4 ;
steðugur:steðug l4 ;
foyrutur:foyrut l5 ;
keiputur:keiput l5 ;
nyðrutur:nyðrut l5 ;
skvaggutur:skvaggut l5 ;
eintónaður:eintónað l6 ;
gøvgaður:gøvgað l6 ;
ókúgaður:ókúgað l6 ;
trongskipaður:trongskipað l6 ;
eyðsýndur:eyðsýnd l7 ;
hálvkvaldur:hálvkvald l7 ;
ósløgdur:ósløgd l7 ;
úrvaldur:úrvald l7 ;
flísalagdur:flísalagd l8 ;
ílagdur:ílagd l8 ;
nýlagdur:nýlagd l8 ;
túsundfaldur:túsundfald l8 ;
flatur:flat l9 ;
latur:lat l9 ;
pillsvakur:pillsvak l9 ;
stevjavnur:stevjavn l9 ;
blúgvur:blúgv l10 ;
drúgvur:drúgv l10 ;
happadrúgvur:happadrúgv l10 ;
máldrúgvur:máldrúgv l10 ;
hálvflógvur:hálvflógv l11 ;
ótrúgvur:ótrúgv l11 ;
skyldutrúgvur:skyldutrúgv l11 ;
trúgvur:trúgv l11 ;
eysturhallur:eysturhall l12 ;
knappur:knapp l12 ;
óhvassur:óhvass l12 ;
suðurhallur:suðurhall l12 ;
ertingarsamur:ertingarsam l13 ;
hóvsamur:hóvsam l13 ;
ótolsamur:ótolsam l13 ;
tvørnæmur:tvørnæm l13 ;
hálvharður:hálvharð l14 ;
streymharður:streymharð l14 ;
deyðamóður:deyðamóð l15 ;
fróður:fróð l15 ;
kotamorreyður:kotamorreyð l15 ;
sinnisóður:sinnisóð l15 ;
eygagóður:eygagóð l16 ;
hagagóður:hagagóð l16 ;
kraftgóður:kraftgóð l16 ;
rúmgóður:rúmgóð l16 ;
fjarbláur:fjarblá l17 ;
kjálkagráur:kjálkagrá l17 ;
nýur:ný l17 ;
skuldfríur:skuldfrí l17 ;
eintýddur:eintýdd l18 ;
herðasneiddur:herðasneidd l18 ;
lættskøddur:lættskødd l18 ;
rakføddur:rakfødd l18 ;
alnýggjur:alnýggj l19 ;
brannýggjur:brannýggj l19 ;
lýggjur:lýggj l19 ;
spildurnýggjur:spildurnýggj l19 ;
deyðakyrrur:deyðakyrr l20 ;
fullturrur:fullturr l20 ;
magnfullur:magnfull l20 ;
stummur:stumm l20 ;
greytsvartur:greytsvart l21 ;
landfastur:landfast l21 ;
skallasvartur:skallasvart l21 ;
vongsvartur:vongsvart l21 ;
heimastaddur:heimastadd l22 ;
síðklæddur:síðklædd l22 ;
fjøðurtættur:fjøðurtætt l23 ;
høvuðlættur:høvuðlætt l23 ;
morgunlættur:morgunlætt l23 ;
slættur:slætt l23 ;
galliskur:gallisk l24 ;
lettiskur:lettisk l24 ;
rómverskur:rómversk l24 ;
vesturlendskur:vesturlendsk l24 ;
aldanskur:aldansk l25 ;
afrikanskur:afrikansk l25 ;
hálvdanskur:hálvdansk l25 ;
ramdanskur:ramdansk l25 ;
fylgin l26 ;
kitlin l26 ;
óttasligin l26 ;
tamin l26 ;
eyðbiðin l27 ;
hálvsmæðin l27 ;
lýðin l27 ;
óstaðin l27 ;
føsilmikil l28 ;
ljóðmikil l28 ;
saftarlítil l28 ;
veldismikil l28 ;
fíggjarligur:fíggjarlig l29 ;
kámligur:kámlig l29 ;
óatkomiligur:óatkomilig l29 ;
regluligur:reglulig l29 ;
bitur:bit l30 ;
gørvitur:gørvit l30 ;
tepur:tep l30 ;
tvævetur:tvævet l30 ;
døpul l31 ;
trupul l31 ;
fastgrógvin l32 ;
havrógvin l32 ;
mosagrógvin l32 ;
rætttrúgvin l32 ;
áragamal l33 ;
eldgamal l33 ;
hálvgamal l33 ;
samal l33 ;
harðvunnin l34 ;
kroppin l34 ;
rættskaffin l34 ;
veggfellin l34 ;
ágeingin l35 ;
feingin l35 ;
ófeingin l35 ;
smeikin l35 ;
hálvliðugur:hálvliðug l36 ;
óliðugur:óliðug l36 ;
fullliðugur:fullliðug l37 ;
hálvliðugur:hálvliðug l37 ;
liðugur:liðug l37 ;
óliðugur:óliðug l37 ;
komputur:komput l38 ;
ønutur:ønut l38 ;
eyglittur:eyglitt l39 ;
kjaftfittur:kjaftfitt l39 ;
ólittur:ólitt l39 ;
stokksettur:stokksett l39 ;
gallharður:gallharð l14 ;
stálharður:stálharð l14 ;
burtursmæddur:burtursmædd l22 ;
kirkjuklæddur:kirkjuklædd l22 ;
hálvliðugur:hálvliðug l36 ;
óliðugur:óliðug l36 ;
hurlutur:hurlut l38 ;
øgnutur:øgnut l38 ;
